Georgia statutes. TITLE 11 Commercial Code
PART 6 Transition Provisions for Revised Article 8 and Conforming Amendments to Articles 1, 3, 4, 5, 9, and 10

11-8-601.
Effective date.

This Act takes effect July 1, 1998.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-8-601, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1323, § 1.

11-8-602.
Repeals.

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 5, effective July 1, 2010.

11-8-603.
Savings clause.

This Act does not affect an action or proceeding commenced before this Act takes effect.

If a security interest in a security is perfected at the date this Act takes effect, and the action by which the security interest was perfected would suffice to perfect a security interest under this Act, no further action is required to continue perfection. If a security interest in a security is perfected at the date this Act takes effect but the action by which the security interest was perfected would not suffice to perfect a security interest under this Act, the security interest remains perfected for a period of four months after the effective date and continues perfected thereafter if appropriate action to perfect under this Act is taken within that period. If a security interest is perfected at the date this Act takes effect and the security interest can be perfected by filing under this Act, a financing statement signed by the secured party instead of the debtor may be filed within that period to continue perfection or thereafter to perfect.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-8-603, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1323, § 1.